Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.761

Action on plan of conversion by converting limited partnership.

(1) Subject to RCW 25.10.796, a plan of conversion must be consented to by all the partners of a converting limited partnership.

(2) Subject to RCW 25.10.796 and any contractual rights, after a conversion is approved, and at any time before a filing is made under RCW 25.10.766, a converting limited partnership may amend the plan or abandon the planned conversion:

(a) As provided in the plan; and

(b) Except as prohibited by the plan, by the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1103.]